Indiana, session 2026, SB57.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-13-2-20, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 91, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this
section or IC 12-8-10-7, payment for any services, supplies, materials,
or equipment shall not be paid from any fund or state money in
advance of receipt of such services, supplies, materials, or equipment
by the state.
(b) With the prior approval of the budget agency, payment may be
made in advance for any of the following:
(1) War surplus property.
(2) Property purchased or leased from the United States
government or its agencies.
(3) Dues and subscriptions.
(4) License fees.
(5) Insurance premiums.
(6) Utility connection charges.
(7) Federal grant programs where advance funding is not
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


prohibited and, except as provided in subsection (i), the
contracting party posts sufficient security to cover the amount
advanced.
(8) Grants of state funds authorized by statute.
(9) Employee expense vouchers.
(10) Beneficiary payments to the administrator of a program of
self-insurance.
(11) Services, supplies, materials, or equipment to be received
from an agency or from a body corporate and politic.
(12) Expenses for the operation of offices that represent the state
under contracts with the Indiana economic development
corporation and that are located outside Indiana.
(13) Services, supplies, materials, or equipment to be used for
more than one (1) year under a discounted contractual
arrangement funded through a designated leasing entity.
(14) Maintenance of equipment and maintenance of software if
there are appropriate contractual safeguards for refunds as
determined by the budget agency.
(15) Exhibits, artifacts, specimens, or other unique items of
cultural or historical value or interest purchased by the state
museum.
(16) Exhibits, artifacts, specimens, or other unique items of
cultural or historical value or interest purchased by the
division of historic sites.
(c) Any agency and any state educational institution may make
advance payments to its employees for duly accountable expenses
exceeding ten dollars ($10) incurred through travel approved by:
(1) the employee's respective agency director, in the case of an
agency; and
(2) a duly authorized person, in the case of any state educational
institution.
(d) The state comptroller may, with the approval of the budget
agency and of the commissioner of the Indiana department of
administration:
(1) appoint a special disbursing officer for any agency or group of
agencies whenever it is necessary or expedient that a special
record be kept of a particular class of disbursements or when
disbursements are made from a special fund; and
(2) approve advances to the special disbursing officer or officers
from any available appropriation for the purpose.
(e) The state comptroller shall issue the state comptroller's warrant
to the special disbursing officer to be disbursed by the disbursing
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


officer as provided in this section. Special disbursing officers shall in
no event make disbursements or payments for supplies or current
operating expenses of any agency or for contractual services or
equipment not purchased or contracted for in accordance with this
chapter and IC 5-22. No special disbursing officer shall be appointed
and no money shall be advanced until procedures covering the
operations of special disbursing officers have been adopted by the
Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency. These procedures must include the following provisions:
(1) Provisions establishing the authorized levels of special
disbursing officer accounts and establishing the maximum
amount which may be expended on a single purchase from special
disbursing officer funds without prior approval.
(2) Provisions requiring that each time a special disbursing officer
makes an accounting to the state comptroller of the expenditure
of the advanced funds, the state comptroller shall request that the
Indiana department of administration review the accounting for
compliance with IC 5-22.
(3) A provision that, unless otherwise approved by the
commissioner of the Indiana department of administration, the
special disbursing officer must be the same individual as the
procurements agent under IC 4-13-1.3-5.
(4) A provision that each disbursing officer be trained by the
Indiana department of administration in the proper handling of
money advanced to the officer under this section.
(f) The commissioner of the Indiana department of administration
shall cite in a letter to the special disbursing officer the exact purpose
or purposes for which the money advanced may be expended.
(g) A special disbursing officer may issue a check to a person
without requiring a certification under IC 5-11-10-1 if the officer:
(1) is authorized to make the disbursement; and
(2) complies with procedures adopted by the state board of
accounts to govern the issuance of checks under this subsection.
(h) A special disbursing officer is not personally liable for a check
issued under subsection (g) if:
(1) the officer complies with the procedures described in
subsection (g); and
(2) funds are appropriated and available to pay the warrant.
(i) For contracts entered into between the department of workforce
development or the Indiana commission for career and technical
education and:
(1) a school corporation (as defined in IC 20-18-2-16); or
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(2) a state educational institution;
the contracting parties are not required to post security to cover the
amount advanced.
SECTION 2. IC 4-13.6-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.166-2013,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) This article applies to every expenditure of
public funds, regardless of their source, including federal assistance
money, by any governmental body for any public works project.
(b) This article does not apply to the following:
(1) The Indiana commission for higher education.
(2) State educational institutions.
(3) Military officers and military and armory boards of the state.
(4) The state fair commission.
(5) Any entity established by the general assembly as a body
corporate and politic having authority and power to issue bonds
to be secured and repaid solely by revenues pledged for that
purpose. However, such an entity shall comply with this article if
the law creating the entity requires it to do so.
(6) The Indiana department of transportation, except to the extent
that the Indiana department of transportation uses the services
provided by the department under this article.
(7) The Indiana state museum and historic sites corporation.
SECTION 3. IC 4-37-1-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. "Chief executive officer" refers to the chief
executive officer of the Indiana state museum and historic sites
corporation appointed under IC 4-37-2-5 and the director of the state
museum.
SECTION 4. IC 4-37-1-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. "Corporation" refers to the Indiana state
museum and historic sites corporation established by IC 4-37-2-1.
SECTION 5. IC 4-37-1-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. "Fund" refers to the state museum and historic
sites development fund established by IC 4-37-7-1.
SECTION 6. IC 4-37-1-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. "Historic site" refers to a state historic site
established and maintained by the board under the criteria established
by the board. has the meaning set forth in IC 14-20-1.5-4.
SECTION 7. IC 4-37-1-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


2026]. Sec. 8. "Museum" refers to the state museum.
SECTION 8. IC 4-37-1-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. "State museums" museum" refers to the
following:
(1) The state museum located in the White River State Park.
(2) The historic sites.
SECTION 9. IC 4-37-2-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The Indiana state museum and historic sites
corporation is established.
SECTION 10. IC 4-37-2-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) After June 30, 2011, 2026, rules that
concern the division of state museums and historic sites that were
adopted by the natural resources commission to govern the state
museum shall be treated as rules applying to the corporation.
(b) After June 30, 2026, rules that concern the division of state
museums and historic sites that were adopted by the natural
resources commission to govern historic sites shall be treated as
rules applying to the division of historic sites (IC 14-20-1.5).
(b) (c) After June 30, 2011, 2026, a reference to the department of
natural resources in a statute or rule concerning the division of state
museums and historic sites' management of the state museum shall
be treated as a reference to the corporation.
(d) After June 30, 2026, a reference to the department of natural
resources in a statute or rule concerning the division of state
museums and historic sites' management of historic sites shall be
treated as a reference to the division of historic sites (IC 14-20-1.5).
SECTION 11. IC 4-37-4-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The title to the following shall be held in the
name of the State of Indiana:
(1) Property constituting the state museums, museum, except to
the extent that the property is subject to a use and occupancy
agreement between the Indiana finance authority and the Indiana
department of administration.
(2) Property acquired by the board.
SECTION 12. IC 4-37-4-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The board shall do the following:
(1) Operate and administer the state museums. museum.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(2) Maintain accreditation of the state museums. museum.
(3) Collect, preserve, display, and interpret artifacts and materials
reflecting the cultural and natural history of Indiana.
(4) Prepare and maintain a statewide inventory of the artifacts and
materials described in subdivision (3).
(5) Uphold the highest professional and ethical standards, as
adopted by the American Association of Museums.
SECTION 13. IC 4-37-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.189-2018,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The board may do the following:
(1) Do any and all acts and things necessary, proper, or
convenient to carry out this article.
(2) Hold meetings under IC 5-14-1.5 at the times and places in
Indiana that are prescribed by the board's bylaws.
(3) Adopt an official seal.
(4) Adopt bylaws.
(5) Make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary
or convenient to the exercise of the board's powers.
(6) Acquire by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease or otherwise
and hold, use, sell, lease, manage, operate, clear, improve,
encumber, transfer, convey, exchange, or dispose of the
following:
(A) Real and personal property and any interest in real or
personal property.
(B) Facilities.
(C) Money or stocks.
(D) Any right or interest necessary or useful for carrying out
the board's powers and duties under this article.
(7) Procure insurance against any loss in connection with the
board's operations.
(8) Enter into contractual or other arrangements with the Indiana
department of administration in connection with the financing of
the state museums under IC 4-13.5. museum.
(9) Notwithstanding IC 4-13.5-4-5 (before its repeal), allocate
space in museums financed by the Indiana finance authority.
under IC 4-13.5.
(10) Fix and collect rents, admission charges, fees, tolls, and other
user charges for:
(A) the state museums; museum;
(B) restaurants;
(C) other facilities; and
(D) programs, lectures, classes, tours, and trips.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(11) Maintain shops and restaurants on property that the board
manages and at other locations and employ or contract with
persons to manage the shops and restaurants.
(12) Make or sell the following:
(A) Pictures, models, books, and other representations of the
state museum and its artifacts and exhibits.
(B) Souvenirs, crafts, art, videotapes, digital video discs, and
other merchandise.
(13) Pay royalties, license fees, or charges for exhibits, artifacts,
artwork, or materials.
(14) Own copyrights, trademarks, and service marks and enforce
the board's rights with respect to ownership.
(15) Conduct market research concerning the state museums.
museum.
(16) Adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to carry out the purposes of this
article.
SECTION 14. IC 4-37-4-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. The board shall not do the following:
(1) Operate and administer historic sites.
(2) Maintain accreditation of historic sites.
SECTION 15. IC 4-37-4-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.166-2013,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The board may accept or refuse to accept an
offered gift of historic property to be administered by the board.
(b) (a) Notwithstanding IC 4-20.5-7 and IC 5-22-22, the board may
improve, encumber, sell, lease, transfer, convey, or exchange historic
property administered by the board.
(c) (b) Notwithstanding IC 5-22-22, the board may, in accordance
with the board's policies, sell, donate, or exchange artifacts in the state
museums' museum's collections to or with other public or nonprofit
museums or historical societies.
(d) (c) Subject to subsection (d), the board may by rule establish
a procedure for evaluating the merits of proposals to:
(1) accept gifts of;
(2) sell;
(3) encumber;
(4) transfer;
(5) convey; or
(6) exchange;
artifacts or historic property.
(d) The board may not establish by rule any procedure that
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


impacts a historic site.
(e) The board may donate or make short term loans of artifacts in
the museums' state museum's collections to other:
(1) public or nonprofit museums; or
(2) historical societies; or
(3) historic sites.
SECTION 16. IC 4-37-5-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The board shall do the following:
(1) Establish policies for the governance and management of the
staffs staff of the state museums. museum.
(2) Establish the rights and duties of corporation employees,
including a pay scale and benefit package.
(3) Employ or contract with consultants, attorneys, or other
persons as are required in the judgment of the board and pay
compensation from funds available to the board.
SECTION 17. IC 4-37-5-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The board may hire, fix the compensation
of, review the performance of, and dismiss, subject to the governor's
approval, a chief executive officer who:
(1) is the director of the state museums; museum;
(2) is the chief administrative officer of the corporation; and
(3) supervises and directs the work of the state museums' staffs
museum's staff and contractors.
(b) The chief executive officer may hire, fix the compensation of,
review the performance of, and dismiss employees of the corporation.
SECTION 18. IC 4-37-5-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The board may assist in the professional
development of the museums' staffs. state museum's staff.
SECTION 19. IC 4-37-6-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The board may qualify the state museum for
federal and other aid to preserve historic property, materials, items, and
memorials.
SECTION 20. IC 4-37-7-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The state museum and historic sites
development fund is established. The corporation or an entity
designated by the board shall administer the fund.
SECTION 21. IC 4-37-7-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. Except as provided in section 8 of this chapter,
The following shall be deposited in the fund:
(1) Proceeds from admission and user fees.
(2) Sales at the state museum shops. shop.
(3) Facility rentals.
(4) Restaurant sales.
(5) Any other income generated by the state museums. museum.
(6) Gifts of money or the proceeds from the sale of gifts donated
to the state museums. museum.
SECTION 22. IC 4-37-7-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The chief executive officer shall report annually
to the board and the budget committee on the activities, revenues,
expenditures, and profits of the museums' state museum's:
(1) shops;
(2) facility rentals; and
(3) restaurants.
SECTION 23. IC 4-37-7-8 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 8. (a) The chief executive officer of the corporation may
enter into a memorandum of understanding with one (1) or more
nonprofit organizations that are recognized supporters of a specific
state historic site and are exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code. The memorandum of understanding may
provide that the nonprofit organization or organizations may maintain
a gift shop and offer special events at the state historic site.
(b) A memorandum of understanding entered into under this section
may not do any of the following to restrict the fundraising activities of
an organization described in subsection (a):
(1) Require the organization to deposit into the fund the proceeds
of a fundraising activity approved by the chief executive officer.
(2) Require the organization to send money donated to the
organization to the corporation.
(3) Require the approval of the chief executive officer, or the
chief executive officer's designee, before the organization pursues
general donations from individuals and other entities.
(4) Restrict, regulate, or limit the ability of the organization to
hold offsite fundraising programs or activities.
(5) Restrict, regulate, or limit the ability of the organization to
promote or advertise any onsite or offsite fundraising programs or
activities on social media, via electronic mail, on a website, or by
any other means.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(c) A memorandum of understanding entered into under this section
may not do any of the following:
(1) Require the organization to be any type of supporting
organization (as the term is used in the Internal Revenue Code).
(2) Require a representative of the corporation to be a voting or
nonvoting member of the organization's board of directors.
(3) Require the organization to submit to the corporation any
organization documents, correspondence, electronic mail, or other
data that are not required to be submitted by the Internal Revenue
Service.
(4) Require the organization to submit an audit of the
organization's funds.
(5) Restrict, regulate, or otherwise limit the ability of the
organization to promote any onsite or offsite activities.
(6) Allow the corporation to take a nonprofit organization's real
or financial assets.
(7) Require the organization to pay any rental or other fee to
support an event at a state historic site that is sponsored by the
organization or the corporation.
(d) The corporation shall return to the organization any funds raised
by the organization and donated to the corporation that:
(1) are designated as donor restricted funds for a specific use in
a historic site project; and
(2) are not used for the donor's specified use in the historic site
project;
upon the completion of the historic site project.
SECTION 24. IC 4-37-7-9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. Sec. 9. The chief executive officer of the corporation shall enter
into:
(1) a memorandum of understanding with the Indiana department
of transportation providing for the Indiana department of
transportation to maintain historical services provided to the
various state historic sites;
(2) a memorandum of understanding with the department of
correction providing for the department of correction to provide
assistance in maintaining a state historic site; and
(3) a memorandum of understanding with the department of
natural resources providing for the department of natural
resources to provide:
(A) assistance or services to repair or clean up a state historic
site if a natural disaster or severe weather (as defined in
IC 36-8-21.5-7) has occurred; and
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(B) assistance providing equipment to the state historic sites
for special events.
SECTION 25. IC 4-37-9-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The state museum's great hall shall be known
as the "Governor Frank O'Bannon Great Hall".
SECTION 26. IC 4-37-9-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The chief executive officer of the state museum
shall install and maintain the following:
(1) Appropriate public signage on and around the state museum
that displays the name of the great hall.
(2) A plaque located at an appropriate spot in the state museum
describing the highlights of the life and career of Governor Frank
O'Bannon.
SECTION 27. IC 10-18-1-10 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) The commission
shall employ an individual who is responsible for the care and
preservation of all personal property owned by the commission that has
historic significance.
(b) The individual employed by the commission under subsection
(a) must meet the qualifications set by the division of state museums
and historic sites of the department of natural resources. (IC
14-20-1.5).
SECTION 28. IC 14-8-2-16 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. "Artifact", for
purposes of IC 14-20-1.5 and IC 14-21-1, has the meaning set forth in
IC 14-21-1-2.
SECTION 29. IC 14-8-2-77, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2022,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 77. "Division" has the following meaning:
(1) For purposes of IC 14-9-8, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-9-8-2.
(2) For purposes of IC 14-19-11, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-19-11-2.
(3) For purposes of IC 14-20-1.5, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-20-1.5-2.
(3) (4) For purposes of IC 14-21, the division of historic
preservation and archeology.
(4) (5) For purposes of IC 14-22, the division of fish and wildlife.
(5) (6) For purposes of IC 14-24, the division of entomology and
plant pathology.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(6) (7) For purposes of IC 14-25.5, the division of water.
(7) (8) For purposes of IC 14-31-2, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-31-2-4.
(8) (9) For purposes of IC 14-32, the division of soil conservation
of the Indiana state department of agriculture established by
IC 15-11-4-1.
(9) (10) For purposes of IC 14-37, the division of reclamation.
SECTION 30. IC 14-8-2-103, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 103. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
"foundation" refers to the Indiana natural resources foundation.
(b) "Foundation", for purposes of IC 14-20-1.5, has the meaning
set forth in IC 14-20-1.5-3.
SECTION 31. IC 14-8-2-124, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 124. "Historic property", for purposes of
IC 14-20-1.5 and IC 14-21-1, means:
(1) a historic site;
(2) a historic structure; or
(3) other personal or real property located on or in a historic site
or historic structure.
SECTION 32. IC 14-8-2-125, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2016,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 125. "Historic site" has the following meanings:
(1) For purposes of IC 14-21-1, means a site that is important to
the general, archeological, agricultural, economic, social,
political, architectural, industrial, or cultural history of Indiana.
The term includes adjacent property that is necessary for the
preservation or restoration of the site.
(2) For purposes of IC 14-20-1.5 and IC 14-22-6, the meaning set
forth in IC 4-37-1-7. IC 14-20-1.5-4.
SECTION 33. IC 14-8-2-126, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 126. "Historic structure", for purposes of
IC 14-20-1.5 and IC 14-21-1, means a structure that is important to the
general, archeological, agricultural, economic, social, political,
architectural, industrial, or cultural history of Indiana. The term
includes adjacent property that is necessary for the preservation or
restoration of the structure.
SECTION 34. IC 14-8-2-230 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 230. "Real property"
has the following meaning:
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(1) For purposes of IC 14-17, IC 14-17-2, and IC 14-18-6, and
IC 14-20-1.5, includes an interest in real property, such as the
following:
(A) Any ownership interest in real property.
(B) A leasehold.
(C) A right-of-way.
(D) An easement, including a utility easement.
The term does not include personal property or an interest in
personal property.
(2) For purposes of IC 14-20-3, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-20-3-1.
(3) For purposes of IC 14-20-6, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-20-6-1.
(4) For purposes of IC 14-20-8, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-20-8-1.
(5) For purposes of IC 14-20-9, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-20-9-2.
(6) For purposes of IC 14-20-10, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-20-10-1.
(7) For purposes of IC 14-33:
(A) land;
(B) all buildings and fixtures on and appurtenant to land; and
(C) an estate created in:
(i) land; or
(ii) mines or minerals distinct from the surface of land;
by deed, contract reservation in a conveyance, or otherwise.
SECTION 35. IC 14-8-2-258, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 258. "Site", for purposes of IC 14-20-1.5 and
IC 14-21, includes the following:
(1) An aboriginal mound, a fort, an earthwork, a village location,
a burial ground, a ruin, a mine, a cave, a battleground, a
shipwreck, or other similar location on land or under water.
(2) A location that contains or did contain a structure.
SECTION 36. IC 14-8-2-265.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 265.5. "State agency", for
purposes of IC 14-20-1.5, has the meaning set forth in
IC 14-20-1.5-5.
SECTION 37. IC 14-8-2-268, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 268. "Structure" has the following meaning:
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(1) For purposes of IC 14-20-1.5 and IC 14-21, a manmade
construction.
(2) For purposes of IC 14-27-7.5, the meaning set forth in
IC 14-27-7.5-5.
SECTION 38. IC 14-8-2-285.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 285.3. "Trustees", for purposes
of IC 14-20-1.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 14-20-1.5-6.
SECTION 39. IC 14-9-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2022,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The following divisions are established within
the department:
(1) Administrative support services.
(2) Asset management.
(3) Engineering.
(4) Entomology and plant pathology.
(5) Finance.
(6) Fish and wildlife.
(7) Forestry.
(8) Historic preservation and archeology.
(9) Human resources.
(10) Land acquisition.
(11) Law enforcement.
(12) Management information systems.
(13) Nature preserves.
(14) Communications.
(15) Reclamation.
(16) State parks.
(17) Water.
(18) State land office.
(19) Historic sites.
SECTION 40. IC 14-10-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.127-2022,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter applies to the property managers
of each of the following divisions of the department:
(1) State parks.
(2) Forestry.
(3) Fish and wildlife.
(4) Historic sites.
SECTION 41. IC 14-12-2-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 106, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) The President Benjamin
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


Harrison conservation trust project commission is established.
(b) The project commission consists of the following twenty (20)
twenty-one (21) members:
(1) The director of the division of fish and wildlife.
(2) The director of the division of forestry.
(3) The director of the division of nature preserves.
(4) The director of the division of state parks.
(5) The chief executive officer of the Indiana state museum and
historic sites corporation established by IC 4-37-2-1.
(6) The director of the division of historic sites.
(6) (7) The chairperson of the board of directors of the natural
resources foundation.
(7) (8) Ten (10) individuals appointed by the governor. The
governor shall appoint individuals so that all the following are
satisfied:
(A) The individuals must be residents of Indiana.
(B) The individuals must have a demonstrated interest or
experience in:
(i) conservation of natural resources; or
(ii) management of public property.
(C) There must be two (2) commission members from each of
the following regions of Indiana:
(i) Northwest.
(ii) Northeast.
(iii) Southwest.
(iv) Southeast.
(v) Central.
(8) (9) The following four (4) nonvoting members:
(A) One (1) member of the house of representatives appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives.
(B) One (1) member of the house of representatives appointed
by the minority leader of the house of representatives.
(C) One (1) member of the senate appointed by the president
pro tempore of the senate.
(D) One (1) member of the senate appointed by the minority
leader of the senate.
(c) The individuals appointed by the governor under subsection
(b)(7) (b)(8) must represent one (1) or more of the following:
(1) The environmentalist community.
(2) The land trust community.
(3) Organized hunting and fishing groups.
(4) The forest products community.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(5) The parks and recreation community.
Each group and community listed in subdivisions (1) through (5) must
be represented on the project commission.
SECTION 42. IC 14-12-2-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 179, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) As used in this section,
"appointing authority" refers to:
(1) the governor in the case of a member appointed under section
14(b)(7) 14(b)(8) of this chapter; or
(2) the speaker of the house of representatives, the minority leader
of the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of the
senate, or the minority leader of the senate in the case of a
member appointed under section 14(b)(8) 14(b)(9) of this
chapter, whichever is applicable.
(b) As used in this section, "member" refers to a member of the
project commission appointed under section 14(b)(7) 14(b)(8) through
14(b)(8) 14(b)(9) of this chapter.
(c) The term of a member begins on the later of the following:
(1) The day the term of the member who the individual is
appointed to succeed expires.
(2) The day the individual is appointed by the appointing
authority.
(d) A member serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority. The
term of a member expires as follows:
(1) June 30 of an odd-numbered year for a member appointed
under section 14(b)(8) 14(b)(9) of this chapter.
(2) June 30, 2025, and each fourth year thereafter for a member
appointed under section 14(b)(7)(C)(i), 14(b)(7)(C)(iii),
14(b)(8)(C)(i), 14(b)(8)(C)(iii), or 14(b)(7)(C)(v) 14(b)(8)(C)(v)
of this chapter.
(3) December 31, 2025, and each fourth year thereafter for a
member appointed under section 14(b)(7)(C)(ii) 14(b)(8)(C)(ii)
or 14(b)(7)(C)(iv) 14(b)(8)(C)(iv) of this chapter.
(e) The appointing authority may reappoint a member for a new
term.
(f) The appointing authority shall appoint an individual to fill a
vacancy among the members. An individual appointed to fill a vacancy
serves for the unexpired term of the individual's predecessor.
SECTION 43. IC 14-12-2-18, AS AMENDED BY P.L.42-2024,
SECTION 110, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) Eight (8) Nine (9) members
of the project commission constitute a quorum.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(b) The affirmative vote of a majority of the voting members of the
project commission present and voting is necessary for the project
commission to take any action.
(c) A member of the project commission described in section
14(b)(1) through 14(b)(5) 14(b)(6) of this chapter may designate in
writing a representative from the respective division to serve as a
member of the project commission when the member of the project
commission is unable to attend a meeting.
SECTION 44. IC 14-20-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 1.5. Division of Historic Sites
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "artifact" has the meaning set
forth in IC 14-21-1-2.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "division" refers to the division
of historic sites established by IC 14-9-4-1.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "foundation" refers to the
Indiana historic sites foundation, established under section 23 of
this chapter and managed by the trustees.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "historic site" refers to a state
historic site established and maintained by the trustees under the
criteria established by the trustees.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "state agency" has the meaning
set forth in IC 4-1-13-1.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "trustees" refers to the board of
trustees for the division established by section 10 of this chapter.
Sec. 6.5. (a) On July 1, 2026, all real property, personal
property, and artifacts used in the:
(1) administration;
(2) operation; or
(3) acquisition;
of historic sites by the Indiana state museum corporation
established by IC 4-37-2-1 are transferred to the division.
(b) On July 1, 2026, all powers, duties, assets, and liabilities of
the Indiana state museum corporation regarding historic sites are
transferred to the division.
(c) On July 1, 2026, the budget agency shall determine and
transfer funds:
(1) used to operate and maintain historic sites from the state
museum development fund (IC 4-37-7-1); and
(2) from any other account intended for the use of historic
sites;
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


to the state historic sites development fund established by section
22 of this chapter.
(d) After June 30, 2026, all individuals:
(1) employed by the Indiana state museum; and
(2) working at a historic site;
shall become employees of the division.
Sec. 7. The division shall administer and develop the programs
and policies established by this chapter.
Sec. 8. The division may do the following:
(1) Undertake actions necessary to qualify the state for
participation in sources of federal aid to preserve historic
property, materials, items, sites, and memorials.
(2) Provide information on historic property, materials, items,
sites, and memorials within Indiana to federal, state, and local
governmental agencies, private individuals, and
organizations.
(3) Advise and coordinate the activities of local historical
associations, historical district commissions, historical
commissions, and other interested groups or persons.
(4) Provide technical and financial assistance to local
historical associations, historical district commissions,
historical commissions, and other interested groups or
persons.
(5) Develop a program of interpretation and publication of the
state's historical, architectural, and archeological resources.
(6) Collect and preserve objects of scientific and cultural
value representing past and present flora and fauna, the life
and work of mankind, geological history, natural resources,
the manufacturing arts, and fine arts.
Sec. 9. The division shall do the following:
(1) Establish standards and criteria for the acquisition of
historic properties and for the preservation, restoration,
administration, and operation of the sites and structures
acquired.
(2) Acquire by purchase, lease, or gift appropriate historic
sites and historic structures.
(3) Operate and administer the historic sites and historic
structures owned or acquired by the state in accordance with
this chapter.
Sec. 10. (a) The board of trustees for the division is established.
(b) The trustees consist of thirteen (13) members as follows:
(1) The director of the department, who serves as chairperson.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(2) Twelve (12) members appointed by the governor as
follows:
(A) One (1) member of the foundation, nominated by the
foundation.
(B) Two (2) members who are recognized supporters of
historic sites.
(C) One (1) member who is a resident of Indiana's First
Congressional District.
(D) One (1) member who is a resident of Indiana's Second
Congressional District.
(E) One (1) member who is a resident of Indiana's Third
Congressional District.
(F) One (1) member who is a resident of Indiana's Fourth
Congressional District.
(G) One (1) member who is a resident of Indiana's Fifth
Congressional District.
(H) One (1) member who is a resident of Indiana's Sixth
Congressional District.
(I) One (1) member who is a resident of Indiana's Seventh
Congressional District.
(J) One (1) member who is a resident of Indiana's Eighth
Congressional District.
(K) One (1) member who is a resident of Indiana's Ninth
Congressional District.
(c) A member appointed under subsection (b)(2)(A) through
(b)(2)(E) serves an initial term that expires December 31, 2027, and
then is appointed every fourth year thereafter. A member
appointed under subsection (b)(2)(F) through (b)(2)(K) serves an
initial term that expires December 31, 2029, and then is appointed
every fourth year thereafter.
Sec. 11. Each appointed member of the trustees serves at the
pleasure of the governor for a term of four (4) years.
Sec. 12. A vacancy on the board of trustees must be filled for the
unexpired term in the same manner as for a full term.
Sec. 13. (a) Each member of the trustees who is not a state
employee is entitled to the minimum salary per diem provided by
IC 4-10-11-2.1(b). The member is also entitled to reimbursement
for traveling expenses as provided under IC 4-13-1-4 and other
expenses actually incurred in connection with the member's duties
as provided in the state policies and procedures established by the
Indiana department of administration and approved by the budget
agency.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(b) Each member of the trustees who is a state employee is
entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided under
IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in connection
with the member's duties as provided in the state policies and
procedures established by the Indiana department of
administration and approved by the budget agency.
Sec. 14. The trustees shall select a vice chairperson from the
trustees' membership for a term of one (1) year expiring
September 1 following the selection. The division director is the
secretary of the trustees.
Sec. 15. Seven (7) members of the trustees constitute a quorum.
Sec. 16. The trustees shall do the following:
(1) Nominate, when the position of division director is vacant,
a person to be appointed by the director of the department to
the position of division director. If the director of the
department rejects a nominee's appointment, the trustees
shall nominate another person.
(2) Recommend, when appropriate, the dismissal of a division
director.
(3) Make recommendations concerning the salary ranges of
the administrative, professional, and technical staff of the
division.
(4) Review the budget needs and requests of the division and
make recommendations concerning the needs and requests to
the governor through the division director.
(5) Recommend that the department accept or reject, hold, or
dispose of grants of property to be administered by the
division for the purpose of preservation, research, or
interpretation of significant areas, events, or grants to Indiana
citizens for the purpose of preserving, studying, and
interpreting archeological and natural phenomena, cultural
trends, and accomplishments.
(6) Review, guide, and assist in the development of statewide
outreach programs.
(7) Review, guide, and assist in the development of
professionalism of the division's staff and operations.
(8) Review, recommend, and devise methods to enable the
division to do the following:
(A) Increase the division's physical presence in Indiana.
(B) Expand educational resources.
(C) Meet storage needs.
(9) Develop a plan of growth to meet physical, program, and
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


financial needs for both the immediate and long range future
of the division, monitor the plan at regular intervals, and
ensure that the division stays within the developed plan.
(10) Recommend policies, procedures, and practices that the
commission, the director of the department, and the division
director serving as the secretary of the trustees shall consider.
(11) Give advice or make recommendations to the governor
and the general assembly when requested or on the initiative
of the trustees.
(12) Review the conduct of the work of the division. To
implement this duty, the trustees have access at any
reasonable time to copies of all records pertaining to the work
of the division.
(13) Adopt bylaws consistent with this chapter for the
division's internal control and management and file a copy of
the bylaws with the division director.
(14) Hold meetings at the times and places in Indiana that are
prescribed by the bylaws, but at least quarterly.
(15) Keep minutes of each regular and special meeting and file
the minutes with the division director. The minutes are a
public record.
(16) Promote the welfare of the division.
(17) Make recommendations concerning the administration of
the historic site acquisition fund established by section 19 of
this chapter.
Sec. 17. Trustees are not liable in an individual capacity for any
act done or omitted in connection with the performance of duties
under this chapter. This section does not apply to an act or
omission that constitutes gross negligence or willful or wanton
misconduct.
Sec. 18. (a) The commission may, on recommendation of the
trustees, accept or refuse to accept an offered gift of historic
property that would be administered by the department.
(b) The commission may, on recommendation of the trustees,
sell or exchange historic property administered by the department
under IC 4-20.5-7 or IC 5-22-22.
(c) The commission may, on recommendation of the trustees and
in accordance with rules adopted by the commission under
IC 4-22-2, sell, donate, or exchange artifacts in the historic sites'
collection to or with other public or nonprofit museums or
historical societies. However, the commission may donate an
artifact in the historic sites' collection to a public or nonprofit
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


museum or historical society under this subsection only if the
museum or historical society is located in Indiana.
(d) The commission may, on recommendation of the trustees,
adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to establish a procedure for evaluating
the merits of proposals to:
(1) accept gifts of;
(2) sell; or
(3) exchange;
artifacts or historic property.
Sec. 18.3. (a) The trustees may enter into a memorandum of
understanding with one (1) or more nonprofit organizations that
are recognized supporters of a specific historic site and are exempt
from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code. The memorandum of understanding may provide that the
nonprofit organization may maintain a gift shop and offer special
events at the historic site.
(b) A memorandum of understanding entered into under this
section may not do any of the following to restrict any fundraising
activity of an organization described in subsection (a):
(1) Require the organization to deposit into the state historic
sites development fund established by section 22 of this
chapter the proceeds of a fundraising activity approved by the
trustees.
(2) Require the organization to send money donated to the
organization to the division.
(3) Require the approval of the trustees, or the trustees'
designee, before the organization pursues general donations
from individuals and other entities.
(4) Restrict, regulate, or limit the ability of the organization
to hold an offsite fundraising program or activity.
(5) Restrict, regulate, or limit the ability of the organization
to promote or advertise any onsite or offsite fundraising
program or activity on social media, via electronic mail, on a
website, or by any other means.
(c) A memorandum of understanding entered into under this
section may not do any of the following:
(1) Require the organization to be any type of supporting
organization (as the term is used in the Internal Revenue
Code).
(2) Require a representative of the trustees to be a voting or
nonvoting member of the organization's board of directors.
(3) Require the organization to submit to the trustees any
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


organization documents, correspondence, electronic mail, or
other data that are not required to be submitted by the
Internal Revenue Service.
(4) Require the organization to submit an audit of the
organization's funds.
(5) Restrict, regulate, or otherwise limit the ability of the
organization to promote any onsite or offsite activities.
(6) Allow the trustees to take the organization's real or
financial assets.
(7) Require the organization to pay any rental or other fee to
support an event at a historic site that is sponsored by the
organization or the trustees.
(d) The trustees shall return to the organization any funds
raised by the organization and donated to the division that:
(1) are designated as donor restricted funds for a specific use
in a historic site project; and
(2) are not used for the donor's specified use in the historic
site project;
upon the completion of the historic site project.
Sec. 18.5. The trustees shall enter into:
(1) a memorandum of understanding with the Indiana
department of transportation providing for the Indiana
department of transportation to maintain historical services
provided to the various historic sites; and
(2) a memorandum of understanding with the department of
correction providing for the department of correction to
provide assistance in maintaining a historic site.
Sec. 19. (a) The historic site acquisition fund is established. The
division shall administer the historic site acquisition fund.
(b) The following shall be deposited in the historic site
acquisition fund:
(1) Gifts of money to the historic site acquisition fund or the
proceeds from the sale of gifts donated to the historic site
acquisition fund.
(2) The proceeds from sales under this chapter.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the historic
site acquisition fund not currently needed to meet the obligations
of the historic site acquisition fund in the same manner as other
public money may be invested.
(d) The expenses of administering the historic site acquisition
fund shall be paid from money in the historic site acquisition fund.
(e) The division may, on recommendation of the trustees,
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


purchase with money in the historic site acquisition fund artifacts
for the historic sites' collection. All money accruing to the historic
site acquisition fund is continuously appropriated for the purpose
of this subsection.
(f) Money in the historic site acquisition fund at the end of a
state fiscal year does not revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 20. A person who:
(1) knowingly; and
(2) without a permit;
alters historic property within the boundaries of property owned
or leased by the state commits a Class B misdemeanor.
Sec. 21. (a) The division may, by contract, delegate the
management of a historic site held and managed by the division to
the foundation under terms the division considers acceptable.
(b) Under a contract entered into under subsection (a), the
division may:
(1) provide office facilities and administrative support to the
foundation;
(2) assign a division employee to administrative and program
duties at a historic site;
(3) act in an advisory capacity for the foundation; and
(4) accept a donation on behalf of the foundation.
Sec. 22. (a) The state historic sites development fund is
established for the purpose of promoting interest in and use of
historic sites.
(b) The state historic sites development fund shall be
administered by the division or an entity designated by the
division. The state historic sites development fund consists of the
following:
(1) Money appropriated to the state historic sites development
fund by the general assembly.
(2) Revenue generated by exhibit fees.
(3) Concessions.
(4) Donations.
(5) Grants.
(6) Other miscellaneous revenue.
(c) Money in the state historic sites development fund at the end
of a state fiscal year does not revert to the state general fund.
(d) The balance of the state historic sites development fund is
continuously appropriated and may be used at the request of the
division with the approval of the budget agency after review by the
budget committee.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


Sec. 23. The trustees may, by adopting a resolution, designate an
existing nonprofit corporation or establish a nonprofit subsidiary
corporation, known as or to be known as the Indiana historic sites
foundation, that is exempt from federal income taxation under
Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to solicit and accept
private funding, gifts, donations, bequests, devises, and
contributions.
Sec. 24. The foundation:
(1) shall use money received under section 23 of this chapter
to carry out in any manner the purposes and programs under
this chapter; and
(2) may deposit money received under section 23 of this
chapter in an account or fund that is:
(A) administered by the foundation; and
(B) not part of the state treasury.
Sec. 25. The foundation is governed by a board of trustees who
may appoint a director.
Sec. 26. Employees of the division shall provide administrative
support for the foundation.
Sec. 27. The foundation is subject to compliance audits by the
state board of accounts.
Sec. 28. The foundation is exempt under IC 6-2.5-5-16 from the
state gross retail tax for transactions involving tangible personal
property, public utility commodities, and public utility service.
Sec. 29. The foundation is exempt from the following:
(1) The requirements of IC 4-13-2-20 prohibiting payment in
advance.
(2) The procurement requirements under IC 5-22.
SECTION 45. IC 14-20-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The real property shall be administered,
maintained, managed, and controlled by the Indiana state museum and
historic sites corporation (IC 4-37-2-1) division of historic sites (IC
14-20-1.5) and shall be known as The James F.D. Lanier Home.
SECTION 46. IC 14-20-7-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The Indiana state museum and historic sites
corporation (IC 4-37-2-1) division of historic sites (IC 14-20-1.5) may
receive donations for the upkeep of the monument provided for in this
chapter.
SECTION 47. IC 14-20-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. The real property shall be administered by the
Indiana state museum and historic sites corporation (IC 4-37-2-1)
division of historic sites (IC 14-20-1.5) as a historic property and shall
be known as the William S. Culbertson Mansion.
SECTION 48. IC 14-20-8-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 21, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The Indiana state museum and historic sites
corporation (IC 4-37-2-1) division of historic sites (IC 14-20-1.5) may
receive the following:
(1) Donations for the maintenance of the mansion.
(2) Other money that is necessary to carry out this chapter.
SECTION 49. IC 14-20-9-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This section and sections 2 through 5 of this
chapter do not apply if:
(1) the Wilbur Wright memorial is transferred to the Wilbur
Wright Birthplace Preservation Society after June 30, 1995; or
(2) the board of trustees of the Indiana state museum and historic
sites corporation (IC 4-37-2-1) declares for the division of
historic sites (IC 14-20-1.5) declare the memorial to be surplus
to the needs of the state museum and historic sites corporation.
division of historic sites.
SECTION 50. IC 14-20-9-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. The Indiana state museum and historic sites
corporation (IC 4-37-2-1) division of historic sites (IC 14-20-1.5)
shall administer the real property, which shall be known as the Wilbur
Wright Birthplace.
SECTION 51. IC 14-20-9-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The Indiana state museum and historic sites
corporation (IC 4-37-2-1) division of historic sites (IC 14-20-1.5) may
do the following:
(1) Receive any appropriations made by the federal government
to assist in memorializing the achievements of Wilbur Wright.
(2) Expend the money received from the federal government in
conformity with this chapter or the federal law making the
appropriation.
SECTION 52. IC 14-20-10-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The real property shall be administered by the
Indiana state museum and historic sites corporation (IC 4-37-2-1)
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


division of historic sites (IC 14-20-1.5) as a historic property and shall
be known as the Ernie Pyle Birthplace.
SECTION 53. IC 14-20-12-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.78-2019,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. Thousands of Hoosiers all over the nation have
contributed toward the moving and restoration of this historic house
and because the house has already proven to be an outstanding tourist
attraction and in keeping with our great American heritage, it is the
intent of this chapter that the office of tourism development (before
July 1, 2020) or the Indiana destination development corporation (after
June 30, 2020), the Indiana state museum and historic sites corporation
(IC 4-37-2-1), division of historic sites (IC 14-20-1.5), and other
appropriate state boards and agencies give widespread publicity to this
memorial by brochure, pamphlet, or other means.
SECTION 54. IC 14-20-16-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The governors' portraits collection is placed
in the custody of the Indiana state museum and historic sites
corporation (IC 4-37-2-1). The collection shall be permanently
displayed in public areas of the state house under the supervision of the
Indiana state museum and historic sites corporation, which is charged
with its care and maintenance.
(b) The chief executive officer of the Indiana state museum and
historic sites corporation shall inspect each painting in the collection
annually in the company of one (1) or more experts in the field of art
conservation selected by the chief executive officer of the Indiana state
museum and historic sites corporation.
(c) After the inauguration of each governor, the chief executive
officer of the Indiana state museum and historic sites corporation, with
the concurrence of the governor, shall select and commission an artist
to paint the governor's portrait. The portrait must be hung in the
permanent collection immediately following the completion and
acceptance of the portrait by the chief executive officer of the Indiana
state museum and historic sites corporation and the governor.
(d) The Indiana state museum and historic sites corporation shall
include in its budget requests the amount the Indiana state museum and
historic sites corporation considers necessary to:
(1) provide for the proper care, maintenance, and display of the
governors' portraits collection; and
(2) commission the painting of an oil portrait of each governor for
the collection.
The Indiana state museum and historic sites corporation may use
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


appropriated funds or any other funds provided for these purposes.
(e) The chief executive officer of the Indiana state museum and
historic sites corporation, in discharging the duties under this section,
shall use the appropriate cultural and technical resources of the state,
including the department, Indiana historical bureau, and the Indiana
department of administration.
SECTION 55. IC 14-20-16-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2011,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The governors' portraits fund is established
as a dedicated fund to be administered by the Indiana state museum
and historic sites corporation (IC 4-37-2-1). Money in the fund may be
expended by the chief executive officer of the Indiana state museum
and historic sites corporation exclusively for the preservation and
exhibition of the state owned portraits of former governors of Indiana.
(b) The proceeds from the sale of items as directed by law or by the
chief executive officer of the Indiana state museum and historic sites
corporation, from gifts of money or the proceeds from the sale of gifts
donated to the fund, and from investment earnings from any portion of
the fund, shall be deposited in the governors' portraits fund.
(c) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested.
(d) All money accruing to the governors' portraits fund is
continuously allotted and appropriated for the purposes specified in this
section.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year does not revert to
the state general fund.
SECTION 56. IC 14-21-1-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2007,
SECTION 169, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. The division may do the
following:
(1) Recommend the purchase, lease, or gift of historic property of
archeological importance and make recommendations to the
director, council, and commission regarding policies affecting the
operation and administration of these sites and structures by the
section of historic sites of the division of state museums and
historic sites.
(2) Prepare and review planning and research studies relating to
archeology.
(3) Conduct a program of education in archeology, either within
the division or in conjunction with a postsecondary educational
institution.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


(4) Inspect and supervise an archeological field investigation
authorized by this chapter.
SECTION 57. IC 34-30-2.1-18, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. IC 4-37-3-5 (Concerning actions of members
of the board of trustees for the Indiana state museum and historic sites
corporation).
SECTION 58. IC 34-30-2.1-173.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 173.5. IC 14-20-1.5-17
(Concerning actions of members of the board of trustees for the
division of historic sites).
SECTION 59. IC 35-52-14-7.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. IC 14-20-1.5-20 defines a
crime concerning altering historic property owned or leased by the
state.
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Natural Resources, to
which was referred Senate Bill No. 57, has had the same under
consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with
the recommendation that said bill DO PASS and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Appropriations.
(Reference is to SB 57 as introduced.)
GLICK, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 8, Nays 0
SB 57—LS 6306/DI 148